Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.60.250

Secretary of state—Final returns—Scope.

As soon as the returns have been received from all the counties of the state, but not later than the thirtieth day after the election, the secretary of state shall canvass and certify the returns of the general election as to candidates for statewide offices, the United States senate, congress, and all legislative and judicial candidates whose districts extend beyond the limits of a single county. The secretary of state shall transmit a copy of the certification to the governor, president of the senate, and speaker of the house of representatives.

[ 2013 c 11 s 65; 2005 c 243 s 18; 2003 c 111 s 1525; 1965 c 9 s 29.62.120. Prior: Code 1881 s 3100, part; No RRS. Formerly RCW 29.62.120.]